Georgia, session 2025_26, HB439.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 48-8-50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to compensation
of dealers for reporting and paying tax and reimbursement deduction, is amended by revising
subsection (b) as follows:
"(b) Each dealer required to file a return under this article shall include such dealer's
certificate of registration number or numbers for each sales location or affiliated entity of
such dealer on such return. In reporting and paying the amount of tax due under this
article, each dealer shall be allowed the following deduction, but only if the return was
timely filed and the amount due was not delinquent at the time of payment; and that
deduction shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (f) of this Code section pertaining
to calculation of the deduction when more than one tax is reported on the same return:
H. B. 439
- 1 -

LC 44 3017
(1) With respect to each certificate of registration number on such return, a deduction
of 3 percent of the first $3,000.00 $10,000.00 of the combined total amount of all sales
and use taxes reported due on such return for each location other than the taxes specified
in paragraph (3) of this subsection;
(2)(A) With From January 1, 2026, to December 31, 2026, with respect to each
certificate of registration number on such return, a deduction of one-half of 1 percent
of that portion exceeding $3,000.00 $10,000.00 of the combined total amount of all
sales and use taxes reported due on such return for each location other than the taxes
specified in paragraph (3) of this subsection;
(B) From January 1, 2027, to December 31, 2027, with respect to each certificate of
registration number on such return, a deduction of three-quarters of 1 percent of that
portion exceeding $10,000.00 of the combined total amount of all sales and use taxes
reported due on such return for each location other than the taxes specified in paragraph
(3) of this subsection;
(C) From January 1, 2028, to December 31, 2028, with respect to each certificate of
registration number on such return, a deduction of 1 percent of that portion
exceeding $10,000.00 of the combined total amount of all sales and use taxes reported
due on such return for each location other than the taxes specified in paragraph (3) of
this subsection;
(D) From January 1, 2029, to December 31, 2029, with respect to each certificate of
registration number on such return, a deduction of 1.25 percent of that portion
exceeding $10,000.00 of the combined total amount of all sales and use taxes reported
due on such return for each location other than the taxes specified in paragraph (3) of
this subsection; and
(E) Beginning on January 1, 2030, and thereafter, with respect to each certificate of
registration number on such return, a deduction of 1.5 percent of that portion
exceeding $10,000.00 of the combined total amount of all sales and use taxes reported
H. B. 439
- 2 -

LC 44 3017
due on such return for each location other than the taxes specified in paragraph (3) of
this subsection; and
(3) With respect to each certificate of registration number on such return, a deduction
of 3 percent of the combined total amount due of all sales and use taxes on motor fuel as
defined under paragraph (9) of Code Section 48-9-2, which are imposed under any
provision of this title, including, but not limited to, sales and use taxes on motor fuel
imposed under any of the provisions described in subsection (f) of this Code section."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 439
- 3 -